Wyoming statutes. Title 21 Education
Article 2. Community College Commission

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

15A Am. Jur. 2d Colleges and Universities §§ 9 to 17; 64 Am. Jur. 2d Public Securities and Obligations § 120; 71 Am. Jur. 2d State and Local Taxation § 36 et seq.

14A C.J.S. Colleges and Universities §§ 10 to 14; 84 C.J.S. Taxation § 23, 24.

§ 21-18-201.
Community college commission; created; composition; removal.

The Wyoming community college commission is created.

The commission consists of seven (7) appointed members:

Repealed by Laws 2000, ch. 73, § 3.

No less than three (3) nor more than four (4) appointed members shall be from counties in which a community college district is located;

No more than seventy-five percent (75%) of the members shall be from the same political party.

The governor and the state superintendent of public instruction are ex officio nonvoting members of the commission.

Appointments to the commission shall be made by the governor with the advice and consent of the senate. Vacancies shall be filled by the governor as provided by W.S.

28-12-101

. Commission members shall not be employees or trustees of a community college district. All terms of appointment shall be for four (4) years except appointments to fill unexpired terms. No person shall be appointed for more than two (2) full four (4) year terms plus any portion of a term served while filling a vacancy. The governor may remove any commission member as provided in W.S.

9-1-202

.

A chairman and officers of the commission shall be elected biennially by the commission from its members.

The members of the commission shall be paid per diem and travel expenses while attending commission meetings at the same rate allowed members of the legislature. The commission shall meet at least four (4) times each fiscal year.

Any commissioner who does not attend at least fifty percent (50%) of scheduled commission meetings during any year commencing from the date of appointment is automatically removed from office. The director of the commission shall certify the name of any commissioner who has not attended at least fifty percent (50%) of scheduled meetings during each appointment year to the governor who shall appoint a successor to fill the vacancy within two (2) weeks from the date of certification.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 208, § 1; 1987, ch. 175, § 1; 2000, ch. 73, §§ 1, 3; 2005, ch. 242, § 2; 2013 ch. 1, § 2, effective January 29, 2013; 2015 ch. 30, § 1, effective February 25, 2015; 2016 ch. 119, § 1, effective July 1, 2016.

The 2005 amendment

deleted “or their designees” following “public instruction” in (c).

Laws 2005, ch. 242, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 11, 2005.

The 2013 amendment,

added “, the director of the department of education” in (c).

Laws 2013, ch. 1, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved January 29, 2013.

The 2015 amendment,

in (c), deleted “the director of the department of education” preceding “and the state” and made a related change.

Laws 2015, ch. 30, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 25, 2015.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, substituted “seventy-five percent (75%) of the” for “four (4)” in (b)(iii).

Editor's notes. —

Former §

21-18-201

was renumbered by Laws 1985, ch. 208, § 3, effective July 1, 1985. For present provision, see §

21-18-101

.

Laws 2016, ch. 119, § 2 state as follows: “Nothing in this act shall be
deemed to affect the current term of any member of any authority,
board, commission, committee or council. The governor shall make appointments
in accordance with this act for any vacancy occurring on or after
the effective date of this act.”

2013 amendment unconstitutional. —

Senate Enrolled Act 1 (Laws 2013, Chapter 1), which amended this section, is unconstitutional, as it deprives the State Superintendent of Public Instruction the power of ?general supervision of the public schools? that is entrusted to the Superintendent in
Wyo. Const. art. 7, ? 14.
Powers v. State, 2014 WY 15, 318 P.3d 300,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 2014), and Powers v. State, No. 180-673 (1st Jud. Dist. Ct. Apr. 18, 2014).

§ 21-18-202.
Powers and duties of the commission.

The commission shall perform the following general functions:

Advocate community college education to the office of the governor, the legislature, the University of Wyoming, public education agencies, the business sector and other appropriate entities;

Establish tuition rates for the community colleges;

Establish residency requirements, which shall include provisions for military veterans, eligible individuals and covered individuals as described in 38 U.S.C. 3679(c)(2) consistent with the requirements of W.S. 21-17-105(e). The commission shall provide that students receiving a Hathaway expand Wyoming scholarship in any amount shall qualify for resident tuition each semester the student receives the scholarship;

Maintain an administrative computing system contract and Internet or similar proprietary or common carrier electronic system access for members of the system;

Develop and maintain a statewide college system strategic plan for the delivery of educational programs in Wyoming by each college pursuant to subsection (h) of this section;

In cooperation with the community colleges and the University of Wyoming, develop and maintain a common transcript and transfer process system that uses common course numbering for all undergraduate courses provided at the community colleges and the University of Wyoming. The development and ongoing maintenance of the statewide course numbering system, including determining course equivalencies, shall be accomplished with the assistance of appropriate committees that shall include faculty members and staff of the community colleges and the University of Wyoming. The system shall:

Facilitate program planning and the transfer of students and course credits between the community colleges and the University of Wyoming;

Offer functionality to transmit transcript information between the community colleges and the University of Wyoming;

Extend to the community college commission, the Wyoming department of education, the department of workforce services and the University of Wyoming a statewide longitudinal education data system, which shall serve as a statewide exchange for management and analytical reporting in support of education and workforce outcomes;

Use a common transcript and transfer process vendor;

Use electronic course catalog software to ensure a consistent experience for students between the community colleges and the University of Wyoming. Each community college and the University of Wyoming may use different course catalog software. The software shall provide a search function for educational programs;

Use course transfer software to support both in-state and out-of-state transfer students. The software shall be common across each community college and the University of Wyoming and shall provide a common database that provides identification and reconciliation of differences in curricula elements of courses with the same course number;

Use curriculum process management software to facilitate and ensure consistency in curricula development and streamline the transfer process between a Wyoming community college and the University of Wyoming;

Result in internal college or university planning and student program planning with required automated transfer among the community colleges and the University of Wyoming. The automated transfer shall allow automatic transcription of course credits among the community colleges and the University of Wyoming for those credits earned through the common course catalog system and within programs with articulation agreements between the community colleges and the University of Wyoming.

The commission shall perform the following coordination functions. In performing these coordination functions all affected colleges and the commission shall be involved:

Coordinate the submission of data to the integrated postsecondary education data systems;

Coordinate and maintain the common course numbering system;

Repealed by Laws 2003, ch. 202, § 2.

Coordinate academic and vocational-technical programs offered by any community college in another community college service area when a physical presence will be established;

Coordinate the provision by means of electronic internet or similar proprietary or common carrier electronic system technology, by a community college or several community colleges, the general education courses necessary for completion of an educational program in the field of nursing at a community college or a baccalaureate degree program in nursing at the University of Wyoming;

In addition to paragraph (iv) of this subsection and for any program requested by the board of county commissioners representing a community within the existing service area of any community college and that college has determined not to provide the requested program within the community, coordinate a response to the requesting board. Any community college shall refer the requested community program to the commission if it cannot provide the requested program. Upon referral, the commission shall provide a response under this paragraph;

Repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 211, § 3.

The commission shall perform the following administrative functions:

Create and maintain a funding allocation model by rule;

In accordance with W.S. 21-18-203(a), prepare budget requests for the operation and support of the colleges and the commission, and pursuant to W.S.

21-18-225

, prepare budget requests for capital construction and major maintenance;

Disburse to the colleges state funds in accordance with W.S. 9-4-601(b)(iv)(A) and

21-18-205

and other funds under commission auspices;

Administer those functions explicitly assigned to the commission by statute;

Appoint a director who shall perform duties as prescribed by the commission. In addition to duties assigned under this act, the director shall serve as an ex officio member of the University of Wyoming board of trustees and the state board of education. The director shall receive an annual salary as determined by the commission and approved by the governor. The director shall hire staff as required to carry out this act and as approved by the commission. Subject to legislative budget authorization staff salaries shall be established by the director with the approval of the commission;

Establish and promote accomplishment of statewide priorities for the college system in consultation with the colleges;

Subject to appropriation by the legislature, the commission shall fully fund a teaching faculty position whenever a community college commits to expanding its college-funded nursing program capacity by eight (8) students. A community college shall be eligible to apply for the funding under this paragraph only if enrollment in the nursing program of the applicant institution was not less than ninety-five percent (95%) of the total college-funded nursing program capacity at the beginning of the most recent fall academic semester. Funding provided under this paragraph for the specific purpose of expanding a nursing program capacity shall be reduced by an amount equal to that provided to fund one (1) teaching faculty position for every reduction of eight (8) full-time equivalent students in the college-funded nursing program, as determined by comparing the beginning enrollments of the two (2) most recent fall academic semesters. Funding reductions shall not exceed the total amount of funding provided to a community college under this paragraph. Any appropriation made for purposes of this paragraph shall, in accordance with W.S.

21-18-205

(e), be accounted for and distributed separately from the funding allocation model for community colleges;

Following public hearing, review and modify or maintain community college service areas provided all counties to be annexed to a college service area are contiguous to that service area. Determinations made under this paragraph shall be subject to review in accordance with the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act;

Administer the state authorization reciprocity agreement and admit authorized post secondary institutions to participate under the agreement in accordance with W.S.

21-18-226

.

The commission shall perform the following approval functions:

Approve all new academic programs, including applied baccalaureate degree programs, qualifying for state funding pursuant to the statewide community college strategic plan developed under subsection (h) of this section;

Review existing programs, determine the most effective and efficient delivery of programs qualifying for state funding pursuant to the statewide community college system strategic plan and terminate state funding for those programs which are inconsistent with the statewide community college system strategic plan;

Approve enlargement and formation of community college districts in accordance with W.S.

21-18-310

and

21-18-312

;

Approve the format of community college budgets as provided in W.S.

16-4-104

;

Approve all new capital construction projects in excess of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000.00) for which state funds are or could be eventually applied. “New capital construction projects” include:

New construction, renovation and capital renewal in excess of one hundred thousand ($100,000.00) market value which is not necessary maintenance or repair;

The acquisition of real property in excess of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000.00) market value whether by purchase or exchange; and

Previously approved and uncompleted new capital construction projects which have increased in total cost by ten percent (10%) or more since cost estimates were developed at the time of initial project approval under this paragraph and W.S. 21-18-205(g).

The commission shall perform the following review and report functions:

Report the findings of institutional and specialized accreditation studies;

In addition to audits required of colleges under W.S.

16-4-121

and to ensure uniformity of audit procedures and reporting formats, conduct enrollment audits and report financial and enrollment audit findings to the legislature and governor. In carrying out this paragraph and maintaining the funding allocation model under paragraph (c)(i) of this section:

The commission shall ensure uniform accounting in recording full-time equivalent students and reporting financial data;

Each community college shall report information to the commission in a uniform, consistent and accurate manner as required by commission rule and regulation;

The commission may participate in financial audits conducted by each community college and assist in the analysis of audit findings for subsequent reporting under this paragraph.

Review college districts and provide subsequent reports and recommendations to the governor and legislature in coordination with the regional accrediting agency;

Develop annual reports to the legislature on the outcomes of partnerships between colleges and the University of Wyoming and other entities;

The commission shall provide annual reports to the legislature and governor on the performance of individual community colleges and the college system as well as on the achievement of statewide priorities as specified in the statewide college system strategic plan. The commission and the colleges shall work together in a collaborative effort in defining the report formats and the methodology and data elements required in preparing the reports and a reasonable time line for completion of reports;
(v) (A) The commission shall provide annual reports to the legislature and governor on the performance of individual community colleges and the college system as well as on the achievement of statewide priorities as specified in the statewide college system strategic plan. The commission and the colleges shall work together in a collaborative effort in defining the report formats and the methodology and data elements required in preparing the reports and a reasonable time line for completion of reports;

For the reporting effort under this paragraph, the commission shall maintain a management information system and each community college shall maintain accurate administrative records to provide the necessary data to the commission for these studies and reports. The colleges shall provide the commission with all data required in preparing each of the reports the commission shall request. The commission and the colleges shall safeguard all institutional and individual student record data under the provisions of the Privacy Act of 1974 and the Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act or subsequent similar enactments;

Reports provided by the commission to the legislature and governor shall be attached with and aligned to the college system performance benchmarks, outcome measures and other performance indicators specified in and defined by the strategic plan.

through (XIII) Repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 211, § 3.

Repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 211, § 3.

The commission and the colleges shall collaborate to identify any additional areas of educational concerns which require data collection and reporting.

The commission shall perform the following implementing functions:

Establish reasonable timelines and deadlines for the submission of data requested by the commission;

Assure uniform college accounting practices in reporting data to the commission, through the use of national association of college and university business officers nomenclature;

Withhold not more than five percent (5%) of state appropriations from any college in noncompliance with this act or rules of the commission. Any such action shall be subject to the provisions of W.S.

16-3-114

and applicable rules of the Wyoming supreme court;

Advance collaboratively developed legislative proposals on behalf of the college system and commission to the legislature and the office of the governor;

Adopt rules and regulations consistent with the provisions of this act as necessary to carry out its statutory duties and responsibilities.

All decision making authority related to the operation of the community colleges which is not specifically granted to the commission by statute shall be reserved to the local boards.

The commission shall prior to the beginning of each biennial budget period, review, update and modify the statewide college system strategic plan. The plan shall clearly prescribe the components of the educational program and attach program components to statewide system priorities. This plan shall serve as the basis for state operational and capital construction budget requests and funding of the statewide college system for the applicable biennial budget period. In developing, reviewing and updating the strategic plan, the commission shall:

Consult with the seven (7) community colleges, state and local governmental agencies and other agencies and organizations representing state economic and industry sectors;

Include mechanisms within the planning process which adhere to the state’s interests in establishing a statewide college system identified as assuring statewide access to:

Academic programs, including applied baccalaureate degree programs;

Career-technical education and training programs;

Dual and concurrent enrollment programs; and

Remedial and continuing education programs responding to needs of students, employers and the state workforce, including program access through outreach or coordinated electronic system technology.

Develop performance benchmarks, outcome measures and other performance indicators which serve as the basis for annual reporting to the legislature and the governor under paragraph (e)(v) of this section, including but not limited to:

Student goal attainment and retention;

Student persistence;

Degree and certificate completion rates;

Placement rate of graduates in the workforce;

Licensure and certification pass rates;

Demonstration of critical literacy skills;

Success in subsequent, related coursework;

Number and rate of students who transfer.

Attach performance indicators to funding to achieve established results.

History.

Laws 2000, ch. 73, § 2; 2003, ch. 90, § 2; ch. 202, § 2; 2008, ch. 25, § 1; ch. 84, § 1; 2009, ch. 211, §§ 2, 3; 2014 ch. 39, § 1, effective March 6, 2014; 2014 ch. 92, § 3, effective July 1, 2014; 2015 ch. 3, § 2, effective February 17, 2015; 2015 ch. 147, § 1, effective March 5, 2015; 2018 ch. 20, § 1, effective March 9, 2018; 2018 ch. 78, § 1, effective July 1, 2018; 2019 ch. 81, § 2, effective July 1, 2019; 2019 ch. 150, § 1, effective February 28, 2019; 2019 ch. 199, § 1, effective March 15, 2019.

Cross references. —

As to effect of Education Code of 1969 on powers of commission, see §

21-2-103

.

As to the Wyoming investment in nursing (WYIN) program, see §

9-2-123

.

The 2008 amendments. —

The first 2008 amendment, by ch. 25, § 1, effective July 1, 2008, substituted “one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000.00)” for “fifty thousand dollars ($50,000.00)” in the introductory language of (d)(iv), (d)(iv)(A), and (d)(iv)(B); added (d)(iv)(C); and made stylistic changes.

The second 2008 amendment, by ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 2008, inserted (b)(vi) and (b)(vii); inserted (c)(viii); inserted present (d)(ii) and redesignated the subsequent paragraphs accordingly; rewrote (e)(ii); and in (e)(v)(A), rewrote the first sentence and deleted “each of” preceding “the reports” in the final sentence.

This section is set out as reconciled by the Wyoming legislative service office.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, added (a)(v); repealed former (b)(vii) pertaining to a biennial statewide college system strategic plan; rewrote (c)(ii) which read “Prepare budget requests for the operation and support of the colleges and the commission”; rewrote (d)(i) and (d)(ii) which read: “(i) Approve all new credit certificate and degree programs; (ii)
Review existing certificate and degree programs and terminate state funding for those programs with consistently low enrollment”; in (e)(v)(A), deleted “as defined by the legislature and” preceding “as specified” in the first sentence; deleted the former second sentence in (e)(v)(B) which read: “The core measurements defined by the American Association of Community Colleges shall be used.”; added “attached with and aligned to the college system performance benchmarks, outcome measures and other performance indicators specified in and defined by the strategic plan” at the end of (e)(v)(C) and repealed former (e)(v)(C)(I) through (XIII) listing specific reports to be provided by the commission; repealed former (e)(v)(D) pertaining to modification of (e)(v)(A) through (e)(v)(C); added (h); and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2014 amendments. —

The first 2014 amendment, by ch. 39, §
1, in (a)(iii), added “which shall include provisions for military veterans consistent with the requirements of W.S. 21-17-105(e).”

Laws 2014, ch. 39, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 6, 2014.

The second 2014 amendment, by ch. 92, § 3, effective July 1, 2014, in (c)(v), added the present second sentence.

While neither
amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in
this section as set out above.

The 2015 amendments. —

The first
2015 amendment, by ch. 3, § 2, added (c)(ix).

Laws 2015, ch. 3, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo Const. Approved February 17, 2015.

The second
2015 amendment, by ch. 147, § 1, in (a)(iii), inserted “their spouses and children,” and made a related change.

Laws 2015, ch. 147, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 5, 2015.

The 2018 amendments. —

The first 2018 amendment, by ch. 20, § 1, in (a)(iii), substituted “veterans, eligible individuals and covered individuals as described in 38 U.S.C. 3679(c)(2) consistent” for “veterans, their spouses and children consistent.”

Laws 2018, ch. 20, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 9, 2018.

The second 2018 amendment,
by ch. 78, § 1, effective July 1, 2018, added (a)(vi).

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (a)(iii), added "The commission shall provide that students receiving a Hathaway expand Wyoming scholarship in any amount shall qualify for resident tuition each semester the student receives the scholarship" and made a related change.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2008, ch. 84 § 2 provides: “The Wyoming community college commission shall periodically report progress to the joint education interim committee on the development of the statewide college system strategic plan required under W.S. 21-18-202(b)(vii), as amended under Section 1 of this act, with a final report submitted to the committee not later than November 1, 2009.”

Laws 2008, ch. 84 § 3 provides: “For the 2009-2010 biennium commencing July 1, 2008, and ending June 30, 2010, two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000.00) is appropriated from the general fund to the Wyoming community college commission to carry out this act.
From this amount, the commission shall fund and is authorized one (1) additional full-time position. Funding for this position shall not exceed one hundred thirty thousand dollars ($130,000.00) for the biennium.
Remaining funds from this appropriation shall be one time funding and shall not be included in the commission's 2011-2012 standard biennial budget request.”

Former §

21-18-202

was renumbered by Laws 1985, ch. 208, § 3, effective July 1, 1985. For present provision, see §

21-18-102

.

Laws 2009, ch. 211, §§ 4, 7, provide: “[INITIAL STRATEGIC PLAN DEVELOPMENT]

“(a) In executing W.S. 21-18-202(h), as amended by section 2 of this act, and prior to development of 2011-2012 biennial budget requests required by W.S. 21-18-202(c)(ii), as amended by section 2 of this act, and W.S.

21-18-225

, as created by section 1 of this act, the commission shall:

“(i) Following discussions with and consideration of contributions by the seven (7) community colleges, state and local governmental agencies and other agencies and organizations representing state economic and industry sectors required under W.S. 21-18-202(h)(i), as amended under section 2 of this act, report preliminary recommended components of the statewide strategic plan to the governor, to members of the joint appropriations and joint education interim committees of the legislature and to members of the community college planning task force created by 2008 Wyoming session laws, chapter 48, section 327;

“(ii) Schedule and conduct a joint meeting of the commission and representatives of the governor, the legislative joint appropriations and joint education interim committees and representatives of the community college planning task force, for purposes of joint consideration of the preliminary statewide strategic plan components and state interests identified and incorporated into the plan;

“(iii) On or before July 31, 2009, prepare a draft statewide strategic plan forwarded as result of the joint meeting conducted in accordance with paragraph (ii) of this subsection, which shall be of sufficient content and scope to guide budget development under paragraph (iv) of this subsection;

“(iv) Utilize the draft statewide strategic plan forwarded under paragraph (iii) of this subsection as the basis for assembling 2011-2012 biennial budget recommendations for operational and facility major maintenance funding required under W.S. 21-18-202(c)(ii), as amended by section 2 of this act, and facility prioritization and funding under W.S.

21-18-225

, as created under section 1 of this act;

“(v) Submit the draft statewide strategic plan forwarded under paragraph (iii) of this subsection to each president of the seven (7) community colleges. Each president shall provide the draft plan to his district board of trustees. Each board shall review the draft plan and shall appoint a designee to report back to the commission prior to the timelines specified under paragraph (vi) of this subsection and the November 1, 2009, final report date required under 2008 Wyoming Session Laws, chapter 84, section 2. Upon approval of a majority of the designees of each of the seven (7) community college boards of trustees, the commission shall forward the draft statewide strategic plan pursuant to paragraph (vi) of this subsection;

“(vi) Prior to completion of the final statewide strategic plan by November 1, 2009 as required by and in accordance with 2008 Wyoming session laws, chapter 84, section 2, and following approval of the majority of the district board designees in accordance with paragraph (v) of this subsection, convene an additional joint meeting of the commission and representatives of the governor, the legislative joint appropriations and joint education interim committees and representatives of the community college planning task force. Recommendations for components of the statewide strategic plan, to be applied to the 2011-2012 biennium, shall be presented to meeting participants by the commission. No meeting shall occur unless a representative from each of the participants designated under this paragraph is in attendance. Based upon discussions resulting from this meeting, a statewide strategic plan reflecting meeting discussions shall be forwarded by the commission to the governor, members of the joint appropriations and joint education interim committees and members of the community college planning task force;

“(vii) Allow any participant of the joint meeting conducted under paragraph (vi) of this subsection to, within thirty (30) days after receipt of a plan forwarded under paragraph (vi) of this subsection, file an exception to or a concern with the forwarded plan. On or before January 1, 2010, the commission shall provide specific recommendations addressing any filed exceptions or concerns to the joint appropriations and joint education interim committees;

“(viii) Report the final statewide strategic plan developed under this section and 2008 Wyoming session laws, chapter 84, section 2, and applicable to the 2011-2012 biennium, to the governor and members of the legislature prior to the commencement date of the 2010 budget session of the legislature, together with any specific recommendations forwarded under paragraph (vii) of this subsection.”

Section 7. “[APPROPRIATIONS AND POSITION AUTHORIZATIONS]

“(a) The Wyoming community college commission is authorized one (1) additional full-time at-will administrative support position to assist in the administration of this act. For purposes of this subsection, fifty thousand dollars ($50,000.00) is appropriated from the general fund to the community college commission for the period commencing on the effective date of this subsection and ending June 30, 2010. This appropriation shall be expended for the costs of the additional position only.

“(b) One hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000.00) is appropriated from the general fund to the Wyoming community college commission for an additional full-time at-will position within the commission to manage data requirements associated with the administration of the strategic planning responsibilities imposed by W.S. 21-18-202(h), as amended by section 2 of this act. This appropriation is for the period commencing on the effective date of this subsection and ending June 30, 2010, and the expenditure of this appropriation shall be restricted to funding the additional position authorized by this subsection.”

Laws 2018, ch. 78, § 2, provides: "The community college commission, the community colleges of the state and the University of Wyoming shall work collaboratively to develop the common college transcript system under
W.S. 21-18-202(a)(vi) as created by this act. The University of Wyoming and the community college commission, in cooperation with the seven (7) community colleges, shall submit a report not later than October 31, 2018 to the joint education interim committee that establishes a plan for development of an electronic transcript transfer system that allows each student information system to send and receive transcript data automatically and establishment of a course equivalence and common course numbering system.
The plan shall include recommendations for resource needs and policy or statute changes necessary to accomplish this directive. The system shall be developed by July 1, 2019."

The Privacy Act of 1974. —

The Privacy Act of 1974 is codified as 5 U.S.C. § 552a et seq.

Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act. —

The Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act is codified as 20 U.S.C. § 1232g.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 21-18-102(a)(xvi).

Appropriations. —

Laws 2004, ch. 95, § 311(d), effective July 1, 2004, provides that, notwithstanding W.S.

9-2-1008

, 9-2-1012(e) and 9-4-207(a), any unobligated monies appropriated from the general fund to the community college commission in 2003 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 90, Section 3(b) for the purposes of implementing W.S. 21-18-202(c)(vii) shall not revert on June 30, 2004, and are hereby appropriated to the Wyoming Higher Education Authority to implement the provisions of W.S.

9-2-123

for the period beginning July 1, 2004 and ending June 30, 2006.

Laws 2005, ch. 191, § 2, subsection 057, appropriates $250,000 to be used to fund licensed practical nursing outreach program coordinators, which funding is not to be released to a college until the college has signed an agreement with a community outside the college district to offer a licensed practical nursing program in the community.

Laws 2005, ch. 191, § 400, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2005.

Repeals and recreations. —

Laws 2000, ch. 73, § 2, effective July 1, 2000, repealed and recreated former §

21-18-202

, relating to the community college commission, as present §

21-18-202

.

§ 21-18-203.
Budget procedure.

In collaboration with the boards of the community colleges, the commission shall submit state appropriation requests on behalf of the community college system in compliance with the statewide community college system strategic plan. The standard budget request submitted by the commission for state aid to community colleges under W.S.

21-18-205

for the fiscal biennium commencing July 1, 2020 and every four years thereafter, shall be equal to the amount defined in W.S. 9-2-1002(a)(ix). A request for an enrollment adjustment to the standard budget for state aid to community colleges shall be submitted every four (4) years commencing in the fiscal biennium beginning July 1, 2018. The enrollment adjustment shall be based solely upon the calculation under subsection (e) of this section. The budget requests shall be made upon forms and in a format to be determined by the state budget department.

Repealed by Laws 2000, ch. 33, § 2.

To facilitate its appropriation request, the community college commission shall hold at least one (1) budget hearing for the community colleges.

Repealed by Laws 2000, ch. 73, § 3.

An enrollment adjustment request shall be based upon changes in annual weighted average enrollment and only for variable costs. An enrollment adjustment request for a percentage increase or decrease to a standard budget base amount for annual weighted average enrollment shall be calculated as follows:

The variable cost percentage determined pursuant to W.S. 21-18-205(c) multiplied by a fraction, the numerator of which is the difference in the annual weighted average enrollment for the three (3) most recent academic years and the annual weighted average enrollment at the time of last enrollment adjustment request submitted pursuant to this subsection, the denominator of which is the annual weighted average enrollment at the time of the last enrollment adjustment request submitted pursuant to this subsection;

The standard budget enrollment adjustment request submitted for the fiscal biennium commencing July 1, 2018 shall apply the formula in paragraph (i) of this subsection, with the substitution of annual weighted average enrollment for fiscal years 2013, 2014 and 2015 in lieu of the “annual weighted average enrollment at the time of the last enrollment adjustment request submitted pursuant to this subsection”;

Any funding increase or decrease as determined by the state legislature shall be distributed in proportion to the funding amounts determined in W.S. 21-18-205(c).

In preparing the estimates under W.S. 9-3-210(c), the community college commission shall submit an exception budget request for health insurance funding needs related to the addition of any benefitted positions created during the preceding fiscal year at the colleges in the commission’s budget request for the subsequent fiscal year.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 252, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 21-481.2; Laws 1977, ch. 169, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21-3-212; W.S. 1977, §

21-18-212

; Laws 1979, ch. 116, § 1; 1985, ch. 208, § 3; 1991, ch. 29, § 3; 1993, ch. 25, § 1; ch. 95, § 1; 2000, ch. 33, §§ 1, 2; ch. 73, § 3; 2009, ch. 211, § 2; 2016 ch. 87, § 1, effective July 1, 2016; 2017 ch. 10, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2021 ch. 56, § 3, effective April 1, 2021.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in (a), added “in compliance with the statewide community college system strategic plan, which are based upon amounts appropriated to the system by the legislature for the biennial period immediately preceding the biennium for which the budget request is to be made” at the end of the first sentence and added the second sentence.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, rewrote (a) and added (e).

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, added (f).

The 2021 amendment,

in the last sentence of (a), added "state" following "determined by the," deleted "division of the" preceding "department" and "of administration and information" at the end.

Laws 2021, ch. 56, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 1, 2021.

Editor's notes. —

Former §

21-18-203

was renumbered by Laws 1985, ch. 208, § 4, effective July 1, 1985. For present provision, see §

21-18-301

.